Hawaii statutes.
[§174C-13] Citizen complaints. The
commission shall adopt, pursuant to chapter 91, procedural rules for the
processing of citizen complaints including the right of appeal to the
commission. If any person files a complaint with the commission that any other
person is wasting or polluting water or is making a diversion, withdrawal,
impoundment, consumptive use of waters or any other activity occurring within
or outside of a water management area, not expressly exempted under this code,
without a permit where one is required, the commission shall cause an
investigation to be made, take appropriate action, and notify the complainant
thereof. [L 1987, c 45, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next